Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 61

Ambulance Services

7-61-101. “Ambulance service” defined.

For the purpose of this chapter, “ambulance service” means the use of any privately or publicly owned motor vehicle for the transportation of injured or infirm persons on an emergency or nonemergency basis.

Acts 1967, ch. 71, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-642.

Attorney General Opinions. Ambulance service fees. OAG 13-09, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (2/4/13).

7-61-102. Provided by county or city as a public service.

The governing body of any county or city of the state of Tennessee may provide and maintain and do all things necessary to provide ambulance service as a public service.

Acts 1967, ch. 71, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-643.

7-61-103. Provision of private or nonprofit ambulance service — Regulations.

The governing body of any county or city may license, franchise, or contract for private operators or nonprofit general welfare corporations to provide ambulance service. In order to protect the public health and welfare, any county or city may adopt and enforce reasonable regulations to control the provision of private or nonprofit ambulance service.

Acts 1967, ch. 71, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-644.

Attorney General Opinions. Ambulance service fees. OAG 13-09, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (2/4/13).

7-61-104. Interlocal cooperation.

No county may provide and maintain, license, franchise, or contract for ambulance service within the boundaries of a city or another county, and no city may provide and maintain, license, franchise, or contract for ambulance service outside its corporate boundaries, without the approval of the governing body of the area to be served.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), any two (2) or more counties and municipalities may enter into agreements with each other and with persons providing both emergency and nonemergency ambulance service for a county or counties on a county-wide basis, for joint or cooperative action to provide for ambulance service as authorized in this chapter.

In any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), or in any county having a population of not less than eight hundred twenty-five thousand (825,000) nor more than eight hundred thirty thousand (830,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, any two (2) or more counties and municipalities may enter into agreements for joint or cooperative action to provide for ambulance service as authorized in this chapter.

Acts 1967, ch. 71, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-645; Acts 1998, ch. 660, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Interlocal cooperation generally, title 12, ch. 9.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of county to provide ambulance service for city under T.C.A. §7-61-104, OAG 03-073, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 89 (6/10/03).

Ambulance service fees. OAG 13-09, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (2/4/13).